Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.250

Conduct of election—Contents of ballot.

The special election for the recall of an officer shall be conducted in the same manner as a special election for that jurisdiction. The county auditor shall conduct the recall election. The ballots at any recall election shall contain a full, true, and correct copy of the ballot synopsis of the charge and the officer's response to the charge if one has been filed.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1421. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 71; 1980 c 42 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.130; prior: 1913 c 146 s 11; RRS s 5360. See also RCW 29.48.040. Formerly RCW 29.82.130.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.